Illinois, session 104th, HB1475.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-3.05 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.05)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-4)7    Sec. 12-3.05. Aggravated battery. 8    (a) Offense based on injury. A person commits aggravated 9battery when, in committing a battery, other than by the 10discharge of a firearm, he or she knowingly does any of the 11following:12        (1) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 13    or disfigurement.14        (2) Causes severe and permanent disability, great 15    bodily harm, or disfigurement by means of a caustic or 16    flammable substance, a poisonous gas, a deadly biological 17    or chemical contaminant or agent, a radioactive substance, 18    or a bomb or explosive compound.19        (3) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 20    or disfigurement to an individual whom the person knows to 21    be a peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 22    private security officer, correctional institution 23    employee, or Department of Human Services employee   HB1475- 2 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1    supervising or controlling sexually dangerous persons or 2    sexually violent persons:3            (i) performing his or her official duties;4            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 5        official duties; or6            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 7        or her official duties.8        (4) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 9    or disfigurement to an individual 60 years of age or 10    older.11        (5) Strangles another individual. 12    (b) Offense based on injury to a child or person with an 13intellectual disability. A person who is at least 18 years of 14age commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, 15he or she knowingly and without legal justification by any 16means:17        (1) causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 18    or disfigurement to any child under the age of 13 years, or 19    to any person with a severe or profound intellectual 20    disability; or21        (2) causes bodily harm or disability or disfigurement 22    to any child under the age of 13 years or to any person 23    with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 24    (c) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 25aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 26by the discharge of a firearm, he or she is or the person   HB1475- 3 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1battered is on or about a public way, public property, a public 2place of accommodation or amusement, a sports venue, or a 3domestic violence shelter, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, 4or other building, structure, or place used for religious 5worship.6    (d) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 7aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 8by discharge of a firearm, he or she knows the individual 9battered to be any of the following:10        (1) A person 60 years of age or older.11        (2) A person who is pregnant or has a physical 12    disability.13        (3) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds 14    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 15    building used for school purposes.16        (4) A peace officer, community policing volunteer, 17    fireman, private security officer, correctional 18    institution employee, or Department of Human Services 19    employee supervising or controlling sexually dangerous 20    persons or sexually violent persons:21            (i) performing his or her official duties;22            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 23        official duties; or24            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 25        or her official duties.26        (5) A judge, emergency management worker, emergency   HB1475- 4 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1    medical services personnel, or utility worker:2            (i) performing his or her official duties;3            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 4        official duties; or5            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 6        or her official duties.7        (6) An officer or employee of the State of Illinois, a 8    unit of local government, or a school district, while 9    performing his or her official duties.10        (7) A transit employee performing his or her official 11    duties, or a transit passenger.12        (8) A taxi driver on duty.13        (9) A merchant who detains the person for an alleged 14    commission of retail theft under Section 16-26 of this 15    Code and the person without legal justification by any 16    means causes bodily harm to the merchant.17        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 18    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 19    process server appointed by the circuit court while that 20    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a 21    process server.22        (11) A health care worker nurse while in the 23    performance of his or her duties as a health care worker 24    nurse. 25        (12) A merchant: (i) while performing his or her 26    duties, including, but not limited to, relaying directions   HB1475- 5 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1    for healthcare or safety from his or her supervisor or 2    employer or relaying health or safety guidelines, 3    recommendations, regulations, or rules from a federal, 4    State, or local public health agency; and (ii) during a 5    disaster declared by the Governor, or a state of emergency 6    declared by the mayor of the municipality in which the 7    merchant is located, due to a public health emergency and 8    for a period of 6 months after such declaration. 9    (e) Offense based on use of a firearm. A person commits 10aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he or she 11knowingly does any of the following:12        (1) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 13    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 14    to another person.15        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 16    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 17    to a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, 18    community policing volunteer, person summoned by a police 19    officer, fireman, private security officer, correctional 20    institution employee, or emergency management worker:21            (i) performing his or her official duties;22            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 23        official duties; or24            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 25        or her official duties.26        (3) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or   HB1475- 6 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 2    to a person he or she knows to be emergency medical 3    services personnel:4            (i) performing his or her official duties;5            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 6        official duties; or7            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 8        or her official duties.9        (4) Discharges a firearm and causes any injury to a 10    person he or she knows to be a teacher, a student in a 11    school, or a school employee, and the teacher, student, or 12    employee is upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a 13    school or in any part of a building used for school 14    purposes.15        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 16    with a silencer, and causes any injury to another person.17        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 18    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 19    she knows to be a peace officer, community policing 20    volunteer, person summoned by a police officer, fireman, 21    private security officer, correctional institution 22    employee or emergency management worker:23            (i) performing his or her official duties;24            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 25        official duties; or26            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his   HB1475- 7 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1        or her official duties.2        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 3    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 4    she knows to be emergency medical services personnel:5            (i) performing his or her official duties;6            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 7        official duties; or8            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 9        or her official duties.10        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 11    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 12    she knows to be a teacher, or a student in a school, or a 13    school employee, and the teacher, student, or employee is 14    upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a school or in 15    any part of a building used for school purposes. 16    (f) Offense based on use of a weapon or device. A person 17commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he 18or she does any of the following:19        (1) Uses a deadly weapon other than by discharge of a 20    firearm, or uses an air rifle as defined in Section 21    24.8-0.1 of this Code.22        (2) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 23    identity.24        (3) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 25    or flashes a laser gunsight or other laser device attached 26    to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, so that   HB1475- 8 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1    the laser beam strikes upon or against the person of 2    another.3        (4) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 4    the intent to disseminate the recording. 5    (g) Offense based on certain conduct. A person commits 6aggravated battery when, other than by discharge of a firearm, 7he or she does any of the following:8        (1) Violates Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 9    Substances Act by unlawfully delivering a controlled 10    substance to another and any user experiences great bodily 11    harm or permanent disability as a result of the injection, 12    inhalation, or ingestion of any amount of the controlled 13    substance.14        (2) Knowingly administers to an individual or causes 15    him or her to take, without his or her consent or by threat 16    or deception, and for other than medical purposes, any 17    intoxicating, poisonous, stupefying, narcotic, 18    anesthetic, or controlled substance, or gives to another 19    person any food containing any substance or object 20    intended to cause physical injury if eaten.21        (3) Knowingly causes or attempts to cause a 22    correctional institution employee or Department of Human 23    Services employee to come into contact with blood, seminal 24    fluid, urine, or feces by throwing, tossing, or expelling 25    the fluid or material, and the person is an inmate of a 26    penal institution or is a sexually dangerous person or   HB1475- 9 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1    sexually violent person in the custody of the Department 2    of Human Services.3    (h) Sentence. Unless otherwise provided, aggravated 4battery is a Class 3 felony.5    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(4), 6(d)(4), or (g)(3) is a Class 2 felony.7    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(3) or 8(g)(1) is a Class 1 felony.9    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 10Class 1 felony when the aggravated battery was intentional and 11involved the infliction of torture, as defined in paragraph 12(10) of subsection (b-5) of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code 13of Corrections, as the infliction of or subjection to extreme 14physical pain, motivated by an intent to increase or prolong 15the pain, suffering, or agony of the victim. 16    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 17Class 2 felony when the person causes great bodily harm or 18permanent disability to an individual whom the person knows to 19be a member of a congregation engaged in prayer or other 20religious activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or other 21building, structure, or place used for religious worship. 22    Aggravated battery under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class 1 23felony if:24        (A) the person used or attempted to use a dangerous 25    instrument while committing the offense;26        (B) the person caused great bodily harm or permanent   HB1475- 10 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1    disability or disfigurement to the other person while 2    committing the offense; or3        (C) the person has been previously convicted of a 4    violation of subdivision (a)(5) under the laws of this 5    State or laws similar to subdivision (a)(5) of any other 6    state. 7    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(1) is a 8Class X felony.9    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(2) is a 10Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 11of imprisonment of a minimum of 6 years and a maximum of 45 12years.13    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(5) is a 14Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 15of imprisonment of a minimum of 12 years and a maximum of 45 16years.17    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(2), 18(e)(3), or (e)(4) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 19be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 15 years 20and a maximum of 60 years.21    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(6), 22(e)(7), or (e)(8) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 23be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 20 years 24and a maximum of 60 years.25    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (b)(1) is a 26Class X felony, except that:  HB1475- 11 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1        (1) if the person committed the offense while armed 2    with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to the term of 3    imprisonment imposed by the court;4        (2) if, during the commission of the offense, the 5    person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall be 6    added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;7        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 8    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 9    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 10    disfigurement, or death to another person, 25 years or up 11    to a term of natural life shall be added to the term of 12    imprisonment imposed by the court.13    (i) Definitions. In this Section:14    "Building or other structure used to provide shelter" has 15the meaning ascribed to "shelter" in Section 1 of the Domestic 16Violence Shelters Act.17    "Domestic violence" has the meaning ascribed to it in 18Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.19    "Domestic violence shelter" means any building or other 20structure used to provide shelter or other services to victims 21or to the dependent children of victims of domestic violence 22pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or the 23Domestic Violence Shelters Act, or any place within 500 feet 24of such a building or other structure in the case of a person 25who is going to or from such a building or other structure.26    "Firearm" has the meaning provided under Section 1.1 of   HB1475- 12 -LRB104 03486 RLC 13509 b1the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, and does not 2include an air rifle as defined by Section 24.8-0.1 of this 3Code. 4    "Health care worker" has the meaning ascribed to it in 5Section 5 of the Health Care Violence Prevention Act. 6    "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 724-1 of this Code.8    "Merchant" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 916-0.1 of this Code. 10    "Strangle" means intentionally impeding the normal 11breathing or circulation of the blood of an individual by 12applying pressure on the throat or neck of that individual or 13by blocking the nose or mouth of that individual. 14(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.)